Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Chapter 11. Swine

§ 69-11-1.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to eradicate and prevent the spread of contagious and infectious diseases of swine in the State of Mississippi through preventative methods based upon recommendations of leading veterinary medical authorities and animal disease research scientists to the effect that raw garbage keeps causative virus alive and the feeding of such garbage causes the spread of several contagious, infectious and deadly diseases of swine. Chief among these is hog cholera which is known to be spread among swine through the feeding of raw garbage. Trichinella infection in human population, foot and mouth disease, swine erysipelas, African swine fever, tuberculosis, brucellosis and other human and animal diseases have been associated with the feeding of garbage to swine. Since the production of swine is of great economic importance not only to the farmers of Mississippi but to the general economy of the state, it is deemed for the best interest and advancement of the agricultural economy and the general welfare of the State of Mississippi to prohibit the commercial feeding of garbage to swine from and after July 1, 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-201; Laws, 1970, ch. 264, § 1, eff July 1, 1970.

§ 69-11-3.
Definition of terms.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following words shall mean:

“Commissioner” shall mean the commissioner of agriculture and commerce.

“Person” means the state, any municipality, county, political subdivision, institution, individual, partnership, corporation or association.

“Garbage” means putrescible animal and vegetable waste resulting from the handling, preparation, cooking and consumption of foods including animal and fowl carcasses or parts thereof.

“Swine” means hogs, pigs or shoats.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-202; Laws, 1970, ch. 264, § 2, eff July 1, 1970.

§ 69-11-5.
Feeding garbage to swine.

It shall be unlawful for any person, municipality, county, political subdivision, governmental agency or department, institution, individual, partnership, corporation, association, other entity or organization to feed garbage to swine, except as permitted under subsection (2) of this section.

This chapter shall not apply to any person who feeds only household garbage to swine for household consumption only.

This chapter shall not apply to the Mississippi Department of Corrections. The department is authorized to feed to swine cooked garbage and vegetable refuse. The Mississippi Department of Corrections shall follow applicable state rules, regulations and guidelines that are equal to or exceed federal rules and regulations for cooking and feeding cooked garbage to swine. The Mississippi Department of Corrections may market and use for consumption swine that has been fed garbage.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4575-203, 4575-204; Laws, 1970, ch. 264, §§ 3, 4, eff July 1, 1970; Laws, 2001, ch. 357, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 69-11-7.
Authority of commissioner and state veterinarian.

The commissioner is hereby charged with the execution and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and the state veterinarian shall have authority to exercise all of the powers vested in the commissioner in the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-210; Laws, 1970, ch. 264, § 10, eff July 1, 1970.

§ 69-11-9.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner shall have power and authority to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations relating to the feeding of swine, the disposal of diseased and dead swine, and all other rules and regulations not in conflict with the provisions of this chapter designed to control and eradicate infectious and contagious diseases of swine as well as rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-211; Laws, 1970, ch. 264, § 11, eff July 1, 1970.

§ 69-11-11.
Inspection and investigation.

The commissioner, the state veterinarian or any authorized employee of the department of agriculture and commerce shall have power and authority to enter upon any private or public property for the purpose of inspecting and investigating conditions relating to the feeding of swine to determine whether the requirements of this chapter are or are not being complied with and to inspect such premises for the purpose of eradicating and controlling contagious and infectious diseases of swine.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-208; Laws, 1970, ch. 264, § 8, eff July 1, 1970.

§ 69-11-13.
Quarantine powers.

In addition to other quarantine powers now authorized by law, the commissioner, the state veterinarian, or any authorized employee of the state board of animal health are hereby authorized and empowered to quarantine any premises, area or enclosure on which swine are fed with garbage and no person shall move or allow to be moved any swine from any quarantined premises or areas except under conditions and requirements prescribed under rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner. Quarantine notices and orders shall be served upon owners or persons having possession of swine in the manner now provided by law for quarantining premises on which diseased livestock are kept.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-209; Laws, 1970, ch. 264, § 9, eff July 1, 1970.

§ 69-11-15.
Penalty.

Whoever violates this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction in a court of competent jurisdiction shall be fined not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), and within the discretion of the court may also be imprisoned for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days. Any party violating the provisions of this law shall not be entitled to indemnity under the Cholera Indemnity Law of the State of Mississippi for any swine that have been found to have died from cholera during the period of such violation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4575-213; Laws, 1970, ch. 264, § 13, eff July 1, 1970.